Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-5809
Certain contingency agreements prohibited; exceptions.

A third-party administrator shall not enter into any agreement or understanding with an insurer in which the effect is to make the amount of the third-party administrator's commissions, fees, or charges contingent upon savings effected in the adjustment, settlement, and payment of losses covered by the insurer's obligations. This section shall not prohibit a third-party administrator from receiving performance-based compensation for providing hospital or other auditing services. This section shall not prohibit a third-party administrator from receiving compensation based on premiums or charges collected or the number of claims paid or processed.

Laws 1992, LB 1006, § 84.